Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1983 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982, and in 1983, 2002, 2012, and 2020 to make other minor word changes.

Cross references. —

For definition of terms used in this title, see AS

11.81.900

.

For provisions relating to punishment, see AS

12.55.125

for imprisonment for felonies, AS

12.55.135

for imprisonment for misdemeanors, and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For a temporary provision providing immunity to state agencies and employees or agents of the state from criminal liability for certain acts relating to ch. 2, SLA 2021, see sec. 13, ch. 2, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

For a review of the sources of some of Alaska law, see Brown, The Sources of the Alaska and Oregon Codes (pts. 1 and 2), 2 UCLA — Alaska L. Rev. 15, 87 (1972-1973).

For overview, see Stern, The Proposed Alaska Revised
Criminal Code, 7 UCLA — Alaska L. Rev. 1 (Fall 1977).

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 166, SLA 1978 (HB 661), see 1978 Senate Journal Supplement Nos. 47, 48.